src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Voloir
+V+Inf:voloir # ;
+V:vol PresPart ;
+V:veill PresPart ;
+V:vueill PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:volu PartEndings ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:veil # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:voel # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:vueil # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:vuel # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:vuels # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:vues # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:vuex # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:vuelt # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:vueut # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:vuet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:veut # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:volt # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:viut # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:voelt # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:vialt # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:volons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:volez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:vuelent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:volent # ;

! Confusing notation. Check for missing forms: voli, volsi, vousi
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:veil # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:vol # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:vos # ; ! Verify
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:volis # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:vols # ; ! Verify
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:vous # ; ! Verify
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:volt # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:vout # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:volimes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:volistes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:voldrent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:voudrent # ;

! Verify vol forms
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:voleie # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:vouleie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:voleies # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:vouleies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:voleit # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:vouleit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:voliiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:vouliiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:voliiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:vouliiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:voleient # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:vouleient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:voldrai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:voudrai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:voldras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:voudras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:voldrat # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:voudrat # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:voldrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:voudrons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:voldrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:voudrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:voldreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:voudreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:voldront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:voudront # ;

! Alternate forms for 1p and 2p?
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:vueille # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:veille # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:vuelle # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:vueilles # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:veilles # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:vuelles # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:vueillet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:veillet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:vuellet # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:veilliens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:veillions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:veilliez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:vueilliez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:vueillent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:veillent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:vuellent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:volisse # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:volsisse # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:vousisse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:volisses # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:volsisses # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:vousisses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:volisst # ; ! Check
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:volsisst # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:vousisst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:volissons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:vouissons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:volissiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:vouissiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:volissez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:vouissez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:volissiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:vouissiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:volisseiz # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:vouisseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:volassent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:vouassent # ;

! Conditional unknown

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:vueilles # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Imp:veilles # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Imp:vuelles # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:vueilliens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:vueillions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:vuelliens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:vuellions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:veilliens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:veillions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:vueillez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:vuellez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:veillez # ;

LEXICON Prendre
+V+Inf:prendre # ;
+V:pren PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:pri%{T%} PartEndings ;
+V+Part+Past:prin%{T%} PartEndings ;
+V+Part+Past:pris SPartEndings ;
+V+Part+Past:prins SPartEndings ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:preign # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:pren # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:prenz # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:prent # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:prenons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:prenez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:prenent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:pris # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:presis # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:prist # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:prest # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:print # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:presimes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:presistes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:pristrent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:preneie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:preneies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:preneit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:preniiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:preniiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:preneient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:prendrai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:prendras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:prendrat # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:prendrons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:prendrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:prendreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:prendront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:preigne # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:prenge # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:prenne # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:praigne # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:preignes # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:preignet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:preingne # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:prengne # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:prende # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:prangne # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:prenons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:preigniens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:preignions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:prenez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:preigniez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:pregnent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:preignent # ;

! Verify
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:presisse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:presisses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:presist # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:presissons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:presissiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:presissez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:presissiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:presisseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:presissent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:prendreie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:prendreis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:prendreit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:prandreit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:prendereit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:prendriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:prendriions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:prendriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:prendriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:prendreient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:pren # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:prenons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:prendons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:prenez # ; ! Verify

LEXICON Savoir
+V+Inf:saveir # ;
+V+Inf:sçavoir # ;
+V+Inf:assaveir # ; ! à savoir, enclitic form
+V+Inf:asaveir # ; ! à savoir, enclitic form
+V:sav PresPart ;
+V:sach PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:seü # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:sai # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:sçai # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:ses # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:sçes # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:se%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:sçe%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:savons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:sçavons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:savez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:sçavez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:sevent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:sçevent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:sçavent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:soi # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:sui # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:seüs # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:sçeüs # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:sot # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:sut # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:seümes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:seüstes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:sorent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:surent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:saveie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:saveies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:saveit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:saviiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:saviiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:saveient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:savrai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:sarai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:savras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:saras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:savra%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:sara%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:savrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:sarons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:savrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:sarez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:savreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:sareiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:savront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:saront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:sache # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:saches # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:sacet # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:sachiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:sachiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:sachent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüsse # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüsse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüsses # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüsses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüsst # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüsst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüssions # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüssions # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüssiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüssiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüsseiz # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüsseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:seüssent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:sçeüssent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:saureie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:saureis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:saureit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:savereit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:sareit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:sauriens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:saurions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:sauriez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:saurreient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:saches # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:sachiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:sachiez # ;
